Arkansas, session 2025, HB1611.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:


SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-62-120(f), concerning the definition of
"animal fighting" with regard to unlawful animal fighting, is amended to read
as follows:
(f)(1) As used in this section, “animal fighting” means organized
fighting between roosters or other birds or between dogs, bears, or other
animals.
(2) "Animal fighting" does not include lawful game fowl breeding
or exhibition activities that use birds that are part of flocks certified in
accordance with United States Department of Agriculture National Poultry
Improvement Plan, as it existed on January 1, 2025.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 5, Chapter 62, Subchapter 1, is amended
*TNL196*
03-19-2025 14:30:04 TNL196

As Engrossed: H3/10/25 H3/19/25 HB1611
to add an additional section to read as follows:
5-62-128. Unlawful rooster fighting.
(a)(1) A person commits the offense of unlawful rooster fighting in
the first degree if he or she knowingly:
(A) Organizes, promotes, or profits from rooster fighting;
or
(B) Receives money for the admission of another person to
a location used for rooster fighting.
(2) Unlawful rooster fighting in the first degree is a Class D
felony.
(b)(1) A person commits the offense of unlawful rooster fighting in
the second degree if he or she knowingly:
(A) Pays to attend a rooster fight; or
(B) Participates in watching or carrying out an organized
rooster fight.
(2) Unlawful rooster fighting in the second degree is a Class A
misdemeanor.
(c) A person shall not be charged under this section solely for being
present near a rooster fight unless there is reasonable cause to believe that
the person paid to attend a rooster fight or was a knowing participant in
watching or carrying out an organized rooster fight.
(d) A rooster shall not be seized by law enforcement under this
section solely based on the arrest of a person for violating a provision of
this section unless there is clear and convincing evidence that the rooster
was used in rooster fighting.
(e) If a person is not convicted under this section, any seized
rooster shall be immediately returned to the owner.
(f) A seized rooster shall not be euthanized unless a licensed
veterinarian determines that the rooster is suffering from an untreatable
medical condition.

/s/Gonzales




03-19-2025 14:30:04 TNL196